Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 7
PRIVATE OCCUPATIONAL SCHOOL DIVISION

Cross references:

For the "Private Occupational Education Act of 1981", see article 64 of this title 23.

23-60-701. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that, pursuant to article 64 of this title 23, there is a demonstrated need for statewide administration of private occupational schools in order to provide standards for, foster improvements of, and protect the citizens of this state against fraudulent or substandard educational services in private occupational schools. Therefore, the general assembly has determined that the overall responsibility for such administration and for ensuring compliance with article 64 of this title 23 should be placed with a division that has only this responsibility. The statutes for the implementation of this division are located in article 64 of this title 23.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 1157, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 34, § 1, effective March 17.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1479, § 21, effective May 28.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1206, § 16, effective August 9.

23-60-702. Definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 1158, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 34, § 2, effective March 17.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1483, § 30, effective May 28.

23-60-703. Private occupational school division - creation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 1158, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1483, § 29, effective May 28.

Editor's note:

In 2008, this section was relocated to § 12-59-104.1 and was subsequently relocated to § 23-64-105 in 2017.

23-60-704. Private occupational school board - established - membership. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 1158, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(5) repealed, p. 116, § 2, effective March 31.

L. 98:

Entire section R&RE, p. 35, § 3, effective March 17.

L. 2004:

(3)(b) amended, p. 579, § 41, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(3)(b) amended, p. 514, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1483, § 29, effective May 28.

Editor's note:

In 2008, this section was relocated to § 12-59-105.1 and was subsequently relocated to § 23-64-107 in 2017.

23-60-704.5. Duties and powers of the board. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 35, § 4, effective March 17.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1483, § 30, effective May 28.

23-60-705. Duties and powers of the division subject to the approval of the executive director. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 1159, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 36, § 5, effective March 17.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1483, § 29, effective May 28.

Editor's note:

In 2008, this section was relocated to § 12-59-105.9 and was subsequently relocated to § 23-64-106 in 2017.